District of Columbia statutes.
2-1404.04

Organization.

(a)

At the initial meeting of each year, the Commission shall determine its organization and name its officers, other than the Chairperson. The officers serving on December 7, 2004, shall serve until the initial meeting of the following year.

(b)

The Commission shall meet at the invitation of the Chairperson or a majority of the members.

(c)

The Commission may establish subcommittees to review issues and make recommendations to the Commission.

Dec. 13, 1977, D.C. Law 2-38, title IV, § 404
as added Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-216, § 2(b), 51 DCR 9123

History